Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
486J

ENERGY
INDUSTRY INFORMATION REPORTING ACT

Part I. Generally

Section

486J-1 Definitions

486J-2 Distributors to register

486J-3 Statements

486J-4 to 5.3 Repealed

486J-5.5 Petroleum industry monitoring, analysis,
and

reporting program

486J-5.6 Petroleum industry monitoring, analysis,
and

reporting special fund

486J-6 Confidential information

486J-7 Confidential information obtained by
another state

agency

486J-8 Sharing of information obtained by the
commission

486J-9 Failure to timely provide information;
failure to

make and file statements; false
statements;

penalties; referral to the attorney
general

486J-10, 11 Repealed

486J-11 Repealed

486J-12 Repealed

Part II. Petroleum Advisory Council

486J-21 Petroleum advisory council; establishment

486J-22 Duties of the council

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2010, c 152, §2.

Cross References

Unfair trade practices by petroleum industry, see chapter
486B.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next